Massachusetts, session 194th, S1970.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subparagraph (9) of paragraph (a) of part B of section 3 of chapter 62 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the
figure “$3,000”, in line 109, and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $9,000.
SECTION 2. Section 6 of said chapter 62, as amended by section 57 of chapter 358 of the
acts of 2020, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(x) a taxpayer who pays rent for their principal place of residence and such residence is
located in the commonwealth shall be allowed a credit against the taxes imposed by the chapter
if the taxpayer’s Part B adjusted gross income is not more than $75,000. The credit shall be an
amount equal to 15 per cent of 50 per cent of the total rent paid by the taxpayer in excess of
$12,000; provided, however, that the credit shall not exceed $3,000 for a single person, spouse or
a person that qualifies as head of household under section 2(b) of the Code.
of 1